Massachusetts, session 194th, H1270.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 110I. FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION OF SENIORS AND ADULTS WITH 
DISABILITIES 
Section 1. The following words, whenever used in this chapter shall have the definitions 
set forth herein, unless context otherwise requires: 
“Adult protective services agency” means any office, division, department, or unit in the 
Commonwealth that is charged with the investigation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of (a) 
elder adults or (b) a disabled person, as defined in section 1 of chapter 19C. 
“Agent” shall have the same meaning as in section 401 of chapter 110A. 

of 5 9  “Eligible adult” means (a) a person 60 years of age or older or (b) a disabled person, as 
defined in section 1 of chapter 19C. 
“Financial exploitation” means (a) the wrongful or unauthorized taking, withholding, 
appropriation, or use of money, assets, or property of an eligible adult; or (b) any act or omission 
taken by a person, including through the use of a power of attorney, guardianship, or 
conservatorship of an eligible adult, to: (1) obtain control, use, or benefit of the eligible adult’s 
money, assets, or property to deprive the eligible adult of the ownership, use, benefit, or 
possession of his or her money, assets, or property through deception, intimidation, or undue 
influence, or by the use of any unethical or dishonest conduct; or (2) convert money, assets, or 
property of the eligible adult to deprive such eligible adult of the ownership, use, benefit, or 
possession of his or her money, assets, or property. 
“Financial institution” means (a) any broker-dealer as defined under section 401 of 
chapter 110A, (b) any investment adviser as defined under section 401 of chapter 110A, and (c) 
any bank chartered by the commonwealth under chapter 168, 170, 171 or 172. 
“Investment adviser representative” shall have the same meaning as in section 401 of 
chapter 110A. 
“Qualified individual” means any agent, investment adviser representative, bank 
employee, or person who serves in a supervisory, compliance, or legal capacity for a financial 
institution. 
“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Commonwealth or his or her designee. 

of 5 29  Section 2. If a qualified individual has reasonable cause to believe that the financial 
exploitation of an eligible adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is being 
attempted, then the qualified individual shall promptly notify the Secretary and any relevant 
adult protective services agency. 
Section 3. The notification required by section 2 must be made by written communication 
or by form as issued by the Secretary. Such notice shall include, to the extent possible: (1) the 
name and address of the eligible adult; (2) the name and address of the eligible adult's caretaker; 
(3) the age of the eligible adult; (4) the nature and extent of the eligible adult's potential or actual 
injury or condition resulting from the financial exploitation; (5) any other pertinent information; 
and (6) any additional information that is required by a rule adopted or form or order issued by 
the Secretary. 
Section 4. If a qualified individual has reasonable cause to believe that the financial 
exploitation of an eligible adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is being 
attempted, then a qualified individual may notify any third party previously designated by the 
eligible adult; provided, however, that a qualified individual shall not notify any designated third 
party that is suspected of the financial exploitation or other abuse of the eligible adult. 
Section 5. (1) A financial institution may delay a disbursement from, or a transaction in 
connection with, an account of an eligible adult or an account on which an eligible adult is a 
beneficiary if any qualified individual has reasonable cause to believe that, after initiating an 
internal review of the requested disbursement or transaction and the suspected financial 
exploitation, the requested disbursement or transaction may result in the financial exploitation of 
the eligible adult. 

of 5 51  (2) If a financial institution delays a disbursement or transaction under this section, the 
financial institution shall: (a) immediately, and in no event more than two business days after the 
requested disbursement or transaction was delayed, provide written notification of the delay and 
the reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact business on the account, unless 
there is reasonable cause to believe such party engaged in the suspected or attempted 
financial exploitation of the eligible adult; (b) immediately, and in no event more than two 
business days after the requested disbursement or transaction was delayed, notify the Secretary 
and any relevant adult protective services agency pursuant to section 3; and (c) continue an 
internal review of the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of the eligible adult, as 
necessary, and report the investigation's results to the Secretary and any relevant adult protective 
services agency within 7 business days of the requested disbursement or transaction. 
(3) The authorization of any delay of a disbursement or transaction pursuant to this 
section shall expire upon the sooner of: (a) the determination by the financial institution that the 
disbursement or transaction will not result in the financial exploitation of the eligible adult; or (b) 
15 business days after the date on which the financial institution first delayed the requested 
disbursement or transaction. A court of competent jurisdiction may enter an order extending the 
delay of a disbursement or transaction under this section, or may order other protective relief, 
upon the petition of the Secretary; adult protective services agency; a financial institution that 
initiated the delay under this section; or other interested party. 
Section 6. A financial institution shall provide access to or copies of records that are 
relevant to the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of an eligible adult to the Secretary, 
adult protective service agency, or law enforcement pursuant to an investigation. Such records 

of 5 73 may include historical records and records pertaining to a disbursement or transaction related to 
the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of an eligible adult. Records made available 
pursuant to this section shall not be public records and shall not be available for public 
examination. 
Section 7. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or otherwise impede the authority of the 
Secretary from accessing or examining the books and records of a broker-dealer or investment 
adviser as otherwise provided by law or conducting any lawful investigation into potential 
violations of chapter 110A. 
Section 8. A qualified individual that, in good faith and exercising reasonable care, 
complies with this chapter shall be immune from any administrative or civil liability that might 
otherwise arise from such action. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this section shall 
limit or shield, in any manner, a qualified individual from any administrative or civil liability for 
any claim, or for reasonable attorneys' fees, costs, and litigation expenses related to such claim, 
for participating in or materially aiding the financial exploitation of an eligible adult. Any such 
civil claim may be asserted by the eligible adult, or on his or her behalf by an appropriate 
guardian or representative who is not involved in or otherwise suspected of participating in the 
financial exploitation of the eligible adult, by filing a civil action in a court of competent 
jurisdiction.